Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-279
Electronic storage, defined.

Electronic storage means:

(1) Any temporary, intermediate storage of a wire or electronic communication incidental to the electronic transmission thereof; and

(2) Any storage of such communication by an electronic communication service for purposes of backup protection of such communication.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 141.